Tennessee, session 114, HB1490.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-5-102, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) Notwithstanding § 10-7-503, the addresses on a nominating petition for the
office of judge, chancellor, district attorney general, and public defender are confidential
and are not open to public inspection.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1490
010601
- 1 -